Colorado, session 2026A, HB1171.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. Appropriation to the department of the treasury
for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2025. In Session Laws of Colorado
2025, section 2 of chapter 476, (SB 25-206), amend Part XXIII as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
________
Capital letters or bold & italic numbers indicate new material added to existing law; dashes
through words or numbers indicate deletions from existing law and such material is not part of
the act.

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
PART XXIII
DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY
(1) ADMINISTRATION
Personal Services 4,286,893 3,081,766 1,205,127a
4,201,796 2,996,669
(38.0 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 744,662 446,698 297,964b
771,411 462,744 308,667b
Short-term Disability 3,654 2,398 1,256b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 23,490 15,416 8,074b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 521,995 342,578 179,417b
Salary Survey 142,960 93,523 49,437b
Step Pay 40,364 38,777 1,587b
PERA Direct Distribution 87,776 57,606 30,170b
Workers' Compensation and
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 35,349 35,349
Operating Expenses 789,451 789,451
874,548 85,097a
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 28,000 14,000 14,000b
Legal Services 152,159 47,393 104,766c
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 70,019 41,750 28,269b
Payments to OIT 313,900 190,344 123,556b
PAGE 2-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
CORE Operations 165,485 74,468 91,017b
Charter School Facilities
Financing Services 7,500 7,500(I)d
Discretionary Fund 5,000 5,000
7,418,657
7,445,406
a Of this amount Of these amounts, $887,488 $972,585 shall be from cash management transaction fees pursuant to Section 24-36-120, C.R.S., and $318,684 $317,639 shall be from
the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the principal balance of the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, it is estimated that $57,142(I) shall be from the State Public Financing Cash Fund created in Section 24-36-121 (7)(a), C.R.S., $43,921shall be from the principal balance
of the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $3,703 shall be from interest or income earned on the investment of the money in the Public School
Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102, C.R.S. Appropriations from the State Public Financing Cash Fund are shown for informational purposes only because the State Public Financing
Cash Fund is continuously appropriated to the State Treasurer pursuant to Section 24-36-121 (7)(a), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Charter School Financing Administrative Cash Fund created in Section 22-30.5-406 (1)(c)(I), C.R.S. Appropriations from the Charter School Financing
Administrative Cash Fund are continuously appropriated and included for informational purposes to comply with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of
Article X of the State Constitution.
(2) UNCLAIMED PROPERTY PROGRAM PROGRAM104a
Personal Services 1,900,442 1,900,442a
(24.0 FTE)
Operating Expenses 1,595,549 1,595,549a
Promotion and
Correspondence 200,000 200,000a
Contract Auditor Services 800,000 800,000(I)b
4,495,991
a These amounts shall be from the principal balance of the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b This amount shall be from revenues collected by contract auditors. This amount is continuously appropriated for payment of contract services pursuant to Section 38-13-801 (2)(b),
C.R.S., and is included for informational purposes only.
PAGE 3-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
(3) SPECIAL PURPOSE
Senior Citizen and Disabled
Veteran Property Tax
Exemption 180,237,698 180,237,698(I)a
Business Personal Property
Tax Exemption 17,948,526 17,948,526(I)b
Highway Users Tax Fund -
County Payments 213,053,162 213,053,162(I)c
Highway Users Tax Fund -
Municipality Payments 134,402,095 134,402,095(I)c
Lease Purchase of
Academic Facilities
Pursuant to Section
23-19.9-102, C.R.S. 17,437,100 17,437,100(I)d
Lease Purchase of
Academic Facilities
Pursuant to Section
24-82-803, C.R.S. 4,753,000 4,753,000(I)e
Public School Fund
Investment Board Pursuant
to Section 22-41-102.5,
C.R.S. 1,760,000 1,760,000f
S.B. 17-267
Collateralization Lease
Purchase Payments 150,000,000 100,000,000 50,000,000g
Direct Distribution for
Unfunded Actuarial
Accrued PERA Liability 225,000,000 164,647,402(I)h 60,352,598(I)i
PAGE 4-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
Law Enforcement Officers'
and Firefighters'
Continuation of Health
Benefits Program 150,000 150,000j
$944,741,581
a Pursuant to Section 3.5 (3) of Article X of the State Constitution, this amount is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations set forth in Section 24-75-201.1 (1)(a),
C.R.S., because enactment of this constitutional provision by the people of Colorado constitutes voter approval of a weakening of such limitation. This amount reflects the estimate of
the money that shall be paid to fully reimburse counties pursuant to Section 39-3-207 (4)(a), C.R.S., for lost property tax revenues as a result of property owners claiming the exemption.
b This amount is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations set forth in Section 24-75-201.1 (1)(a), C.R.S., because it is not a state general fund appropriation. This
amount reflects the estimate of the money that shall be paid to fully reimburse counties pursuant to Section 39-3-119.5 (3)(e), C.R.S., for the aggregate value of business personal property
that is exempt from property tax.
c These amounts represent estimated allocations from the Highway Users Tax Fund, created in Section 43-4-201 (1)(a), C.R.S. These estimates of revenue distributions to counties and
municipalities pursuant to Sections 43-4-205, 207, and 208, C.R.S., are included for informational purposes and for the purpose of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year
spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution.
d This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Lease Purchase of Academic Facilities line item in the Colorado Commission on Higher Education section of the Department of
Higher Education pursuant to Section 23-19.9-102, C.R.S.
e This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Senate Bill 20-219 Lease Purchase Payments line item in the Colorado Commission on Higher Education section of the Department
of Higher Education pursuant to Section 24-82-803.
f This amount shall be from interest or income earned on the investment of the money in the Public School Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102 (3)(h)(I), C.R.S.
g This amount shall be from various cash funds under the control of the Transportation Commission pursuant to Section 24-82-1303 (2)(d)(II), C.R.S.
h Pursuant to Section 24-51-414 (5), C.R.S., this amount is included in the general appropriation bill for informational purposes and for the purpose of complying with the limitation on
state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution and represents the estimated amount of the total distribution that is attributable to public education
from kindergarten through the twelfth grade. This amount shall be issued as a warrant and is not subject to the General Fund reserve requirement pursuant to Section 24-51-414 (1)(a),
C.R.S.
i This amount shall be from funds transferred from the Department of Personnel. Pursuant to Section 24-51-414 (5), C.R.S., this amount is included for informational purposes and for
the purpose of complying with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20 of Article X of the State Constitution and represents part of the estimated amount of
the total distribution that is attributable to the state.
j This amount shall be from the Law Enforcement Officers' and Firefighters' Continuation of Benefits Fund created in Section 24-36-122 (2)(a), C.R.S.
PAGE 5-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
$ $ $ $ $ $ $
TOTALS PART XXIII
(TREASURY) $956,656,229 $468,110,143a $406,003,388b $82,542,698c
$956,682,978 $468,041,092a $406,099,188b
a Of this amount, $362,833,626 contains an (I) notation and $198,186,224 is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1 (1)(a)
(III), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $348,319,899 contains an (I) notation; $347,455,257 represents allocations of Highway Users Tax Fund revenues to counties and municipalities pursuant to Sections
43-4-205, 207, and 208, C.R.S.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
FOOTNOTES -- THE FOLLOWING STATEMENTS ARE REFERENCED TO THE NUMBERED FOOTNOTES THROUGHOUT SECTION 2.
104a DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY, UNCLAIMED PROPERTY PROGRAM -- IN ADDITION TO THE TRANSFER AUTHORITY PROVIDED IN SECTION 24-75-108, C.R.S., THE
DEPARTMENT MAY TRANSFER UP TO $37,850 CASH FUNDS AMONG THE FOLLOWING LINE ITEMS IN THIS SECTION: PERSONAL SERVICES AND OPERATING EXPENSES.
PAGE 6-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
SECTION 2. Appropriation to the department of the treasury for the fiscal year beginning July 1, 2024. In Session Laws of Colorado 2024, section 2 of chapter 519,
(HB 24-1430), amend Part XXIII (1) and the affected totals as Part XXIII (1) and the affected totals are amended by Session Laws of Colorado 2025, section 1 of chapter 473,
(SB 25-110), and as Part XXIII and the affected totals are amended by section 14 of chapter 476, (SB25-206), as follows:
Section 2. Appropriation.
PART XXIII
DEPARTMENT OF THE TREASURY
(1) ADMINISTRATION
Personal Services 4,745,899 3,639,541 1,106,358a
(37.5 FTE)
Health, Life, and Dental 648,766 390,878 257,888b
Short-term Disability 7,476 4,772 2,704b
Paid Family and Medical
Leave Insurance 22,256 14,221 8,035b
Unfunded Liability
Amortization Equalization
Disbursement Payments 436,900 284,242 152,658b
Salary Survey 153,814 100,411 53,403b
Step Pay 102,735 57,369 45,366b
PERA Direct Distribution 75,527 49,137 26,390b
Workers' Compensation and
Payment to Risk
Management and Property
Funds 35,707 35,707
Operating Expenses 2,192,234 2,192,234
2,208,615 2,208,615
Information Technology
Asset Maintenance 18,000 9,000 9,000b
Legal Services 122,197 38,060 84,137c
Capitol Complex Leased
Space 62,530 37,285 25,245b
PAGE 7-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

APPROPRIATION FROM
ITEM & TOTAL GENERAL GENERAL CASH REAPPROPRIATED FEDERAL
SUBTOTAL FUND FUND FUNDS FUNDS FUNDS
EXEMPT
Payments to OIT 265,730 155,374 110,356b
CORE Operations 185,258 83,366 101,892b
Charter School Facilities
Financing Services 7,500 7,500(I)d
Discretionary Fund 5,000 5,000
9,087,529
9,103,910
a Of this amount, $887,488 shall be from cash management transaction fees pursuant to Section 24-36-120, C.R.S., and $218,870 shall be from the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created
in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
b These amounts shall be from the principal balance of the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S.
c Of this amount, it is estimated that $57,142(I) shall be from the State Public Financing Cash Fund created in Section 24-36-121 (7)(a), C.R.S., $23,292 shall be from the principal balance
of the Unclaimed Property Trust Fund created in Section 38-13-801 (1)(a), C.R.S., and $3,703 shall be from interest or income earned on the investment of the money in the Public School
Fund pursuant to Section 22-41-102, C.R.S. Appropriations from the State Public Financing Cash Fund are shown for informational purposes only because the State Public Financing
Cash Fund is continuously appropriated to the State Treasurer pursuant to Section 24-36-121 (7)(a), C.R.S.
d This amount shall be from the Charter School Financing Administrative Cash Fund created in Section 22-30.5-406 (1)(c)(I), C.R.S. Money from the Charter School Financing
Administrative Cash Fund is continuously appropriated and is included for informational purposes to comply with the limitation on state fiscal year spending imposed by Section 20
of Article X of the State Constitution.
TOTALS PART XXIII
(TREASURY) $952,059,166 $466,238,067a $404,002,146b $81,818,953c
$952,075,547 $466,254,448a
a Of this amount, $358,441,470 contains an (I) notation and $193,070,323 is not subject to the limitation on General Fund appropriations imposed by Section 24-75-201.1 (1)(a)
(III), C.R.S.
b Of this amount, $346,669,804 contains an (I) notation; $345,805,162 represents allocations of Highway Users Tax Fund revenues to counties and municipalities pursuant to Sections
43-4-205, 207, and 208, C.R.S.
c This amount contains an (I) notation.
PAGE 8-HOUSE BILL 26-1171

SECTION 3. Safety clause. The general assembly finds,
determines, and declares that this act is necessary for the immediate
preservation of the public peace, health, or safety or for appropriations for
the support and maintenance of the departments of the state and state
institutions.
____________________________ ____________________________
Julie McCluskie James Rashad Coleman, Sr.
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE PRESIDENT OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
____________________________ ____________________________
Vanessa Reilly Esther van Mourik
CHIEF CLERK OF THE HOUSE SECRETARY OF
OF REPRESENTATIVES THE SENATE
APPROVED________________________________________
(Date and Time)
_________________________________________
Jared S. Polis
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF COLORADO
PAGE 9-HOUSE BILL 26-1171